Utah statutes.
31A-6b-203.   Filing new or changed guaranteed asset protection waiver.

A person required to be registered under Section 31A-6b-201 shall submit to the commissioner at least 30 days before the day on which the person issues, markets, sells, offers to sell, or otherwise provides a guaranteed asset protection waiver in this state:

(1)  a change to a term of a guaranteed asset protection waiver previously submitted to the commissioner under this chapter; or

(2)  a guaranteed asset protection waiver that has not previously been submitted to the commissioner under this chapter.

